src/sme2smj-lexeme.xfst
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ======
! Conversion from North to Lule Sámi
! =======

echo <<defining Cns and Vow...>>

define Vow       [ a | á | e | i | o | u | y | æ | ø | å | ä | ö | 
                   A | Á | E | I | O | U | Y | Æ | Ø | Å | Ä | Ö | 
é | ó | ú | í | à | è | ò | ù | ì | ë | ü | ï | â | ê | ô | û | î | ã | ý 
É | Ó | Ú | Í | À | È | Ò | Ù | Ì | Ë | Ü | Ï | Â | Ê | Ô | Û | Î | Ã | Ý |
e7 | o7 ] ;


define Cns [ b | c | č | d | đ | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | ŋ | ñ | ń | 
             B | C | Č | D | Đ | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | Ŋ | Ñ | Ń |
             p | q | r | s | š | t | ŧ | v | w | x | z | ž |   
             P | Q | R | S | Š | T | Ŧ | V | W | X | Z | Ž ] ; 


define Syll Cns* Vow+ Cns* ;

echo << Rules >>

! Defining this rule in the beginning, it is so long...

define rd  m b -> m m b ,   m b b -> m b ,
           m p -> m m p ,   m p p -> m p ,
           m s -> m m s ,   m s s -> m s ,
           m š -> m m s j , m š š -> m s j ,

           n c -> n n c ,   n c c -> n c ,
           n d -> n n d ,   n d d -> n d ,
           ŋ g -> ŋ ŋ g ,   ŋ g g -> ŋ g ,
           ŋ k -> ŋ ŋ k ,   ŋ k k -> ŋ k ,
           n s -> n n s ,   n s s -> n s ,
           n t -> n n t ,   n t t -> n t ,
           n v -> n n v ,   n v v -> n v ,
           n s -> n n s ,   n s s -> n s ,
           n z -> n n t s , n z z -> n t s ,
           n ž -> n n t j , n ž ž -> n t j ,

           v d -> v d d ,   v d d -> v d ,
           v g -> v g g ,   v g g -> v g ,
           v j -> v j j ,   v j j -> v j ,
           v k -> v k k ,   v k k -> v k ,
           v l -> v l l ,   v l l -> v l ,
           v p -> v p p ,   v p p -> v p ,
           v r -> v r r ,   v r r -> v r ,
           v s -> v s s ,   v s s -> v s ,
           v t -> v t t ,   v t t -> v t ,
           v č -> v t t j , v č č -> v t j ,
           v š -> v s s j , v š š -> v s j ,
           v z -> v t t s , v z z -> v t s ,
           v ž -> v t t j , v ž ž -> v t j ,

           j b -> j b b ,   j b b -> j b ,
           j c -> j c c ,   j c c -> j c ,
           j d -> j d d ,   j d d -> j d ,
           j f -> j f f ,   j f f -> j f ,
           j g -> j g g ,   j g g -> j g ,
           j k -> j k k ,   j k k -> j k ,
           j p -> j p p ,   j p p -> j p ,
           j s -> j s s ,   j s s -> j s ,
           j t -> j t t ,   j t t -> j t ,
           j v -> j v v ,   j v v -> j v ,
           j z -> j t t s , j z z -> j t s ,
           j ž -> j t t j , j ž ž -> j t j ,
           
           l b -> l b b ,   l b b -> l b ,
           l c -> l c c ,   l c c -> l c ,
           l d -> l l d ,   l d d -> l d ,
           l f -> l f f ,   l f f -> l f ,
           l g -> l g g ,   l g g -> l g ,
           l j -> l j j ,   l j j -> l j ,
           l k -> l k k ,   l k k -> l k ,
           l p -> l p p ,   l p p -> l p ,
           l s -> l s s ,   l s s -> l s ,
           l t -> l l t ,   l t t -> l t ,
           l v -> l v v ,   l v v -> l v ,
           l č -> l t t j , l č č -> l t j ,
           l š -> l s s j , l š š -> l s j ,
           l z -> l l t s , l z z -> l t s ,
           l ž -> l l t j , l ž ž -> l t j ,

           r b -> r b b , r b b -> r b ,
           r c -> r c c , r c c -> r c ,
           r d -> r d d , r d d -> r d ,
           r f -> r f f , r f f -> r f ,
           r g -> r g g , r g g -> r g ,
           r j -> r j j , r j j -> r j ,
           r k -> r k k , r k k -> r k ,
           r p -> r p p , r p p -> r p ,
           r s -> r s s , r s s -> r s ,
           r t -> r t t , r t t -> r t ,
           r v -> r v v , r v v -> r v ,
           r č -> r t t j , r č č -> r t j ,
           r š -> r s s j , r š š -> r s j ,
           r z -> r t t s , r z z -> r t s ,
           r ž -> r t t j , r ž ž -> r t j , 

                            s s k -> s k ,
                            s s t -> s t ,
                            s s m -> s m ,
                            s s p -> s p ,

           š k -> s s j k , š š k -> s j k ,
           š t -> s s j t , š š t -> s j t ,
           š m -> s s j m , š š m -> s j m ,
           š v -> s s j v , š š v -> s j v ,

           đ b -> r b b , đ b b -> r b ,
           đ g -> r g g , đ g g -> r g ,
           đ j -> r j j , đ j j -> r j ,
           đ v -> r v v , đ v v -> r v ,

           j h l -> j h l l , j h l l -> j h l ,
           j h m -> j h m m , j h m m -> j h m ,
           j h n -> j h n n , j h n n -> j h n ,
           v h l -> v h l l , v h l l -> v h l ,

           đ b -> r b b , đ b b -> r b ,
           đ b -> r b b , đ b b -> r b ,
           đ b -> r b b , đ b b -> r b ,
           đ b -> r b b , đ b b -> r b ,
           đ b -> r b b , đ b b -> r b ,
           đ b -> r b b , đ b b -> r b ,
           đ b -> r b b , đ b b -> r b ,
           đ b -> r b b , đ b b -> r b ,
           
           d n   -> d d n ,   t n   -> d n ,
           b m   -> b b m ,   p m   -> b m ,
           g ŋ   -> g g ŋ ,   k ŋ   -> g ŋ ,
!           d n j -> d d n j , t n j -> d n j   || Cns* Vow+ _ Vow ;
           d n j -> d d n j , t n j -> d n j   || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] Cns* Vow+ _ Vow ;

! Here comes the other rules

define FinalE i -> e || Syll Cns _ [.#.|%#|%^|%_|%'] ;

define ij i -> j || Vow _ ;
define dtj ž ž -> d t j || Vow _ Vow ; 
define ttj č č -> t t j || Vow _ Vow ;
define ssj š š -> s s j || Vow _ Vow ;

define LN   đ m m -> r m ,     đ b m -> r m m ,
            đ ŋ ŋ -> r ŋ ,     đ g ŋ -> r ŋ ŋ ,
            j m m -> j m ,     j b m -> j m m ,
            j n n -> j n ,     j d n -> j n n ,
            j ŋ ŋ -> j ŋ ,     j g ŋ -> j ŋ ŋ ,
            l m m -> l m ,     l b m -> l m m ,
            l n n -> l n ,     l d n -> l n n ,
            l ŋ ŋ -> l ŋ ,     l g ŋ -> l ŋ ŋ ,
            r p m -> r m ,     r b m -> r m m ,
            r t n -> r n ,     r d n -> r n n ,
            r k ŋ -> r ŋ ,     r g ŋ -> r ŋ ŋ ,
            v n n -> v n ,     v d n -> v n n ,
          l n n j -> l n j , l d n j -> l n n j ,
          r t n j -> r n j , r d n j -> r n n j ,
          v n n j -> v n j , v d n j -> v n n j || Vow _ Vow ;

define jNN b m -> m m , d n -> n n || Vow j _ ;




define SK2SSK s p -> s s p   , 
              s t -> s s t   ,
              s k -> s s k   ,
              s m -> s s m   ,
              š t -> s s j t ,
              š k -> s s j k ,
              š m -> s s j m || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%']  Cns* Vow+ ([j|m|n|r|v]) _ Vow ;
define SKK2SK s t t -> s t ,               
              s k k -> s k ,               
              s m m -> s m ,               
              š t t -> š t ,               
              š k k -> š k ,               
              š m m -> š m ||  Vow  ([j|m|n|r|v]) _ Vow ; 

define sl š -> s , Š -> S || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] _ l ;
define zz z z -> d t s ;
define z    z -> t s ;
define cc   c c -> t t s , č č -> t t j || Vow ([j|l|h|k|n|r|v]) _ Vow ;
define c    c -> t s , č -> t j , Č -> T j || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'|Vow|j|l|h|k|n|r|v] _ Vow ;
define RevDipht u -> u o || _ Cns+ e ;


define eCns i -> e , I -> E ||                   Syll     _ [ Cns - j ] [%_|%'|.#.] ,
                               [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] Syll Cns _ [Cns - j] ; 
define it   e -> i || Syll _ t [%_|%'|.#.] ; ! Loan word rule!!
define H2M  u -> o                   || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] Syll Cns _ (Cns|%^|%_|%') ;
define M2H  o -> u                   || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] Syll Cns _ Cns ;
define hit2dit h -> d || _ [ i t | u s ] [%_|%'|.#.] ;         ! Odd-syll verbs  and dus nouns
define longain2ndsyll a -> á || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] Cns* Vow [Cns|[n|s|t]j|t s] _ [ Cns - š ] ;
define tjfromšafter2syll š -> t j || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] Syll Syll _ Vow ;
define SamiLetters č -> t j , đ -> d , š -> s j , ŧ -> t , ž -> t j , Č -> T j , Š -> S j ;

define 1stysllæ e a -> æ || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] (Cns+) _ Cns [Cns Cns [á|a|å|o|u|a] | (Cns) [o|á]] ;

define 1styslle e a -> e || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] (Cns+) _ Cns (Cns) [u|a] ;

define 1stsylldiphthong o -> å , O -> Å , e a -> i e , E a -> I e || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] (Cns+) _ Cns ;

define labialharmony [a|á] -> å || å Cns+ _ ;
define oa2åG1 o a -> å , O a -> Å || [.#.|%#|%-|%^|%_|%'] (Cns+) _  [Cns|[n|s|t]j|t s]  a ;

echo << and the cleaning rules at the end >>

define phones e7 -> e , o7 -> o ;
define technical %# -> 0 , %^ -> 0 ;

echo << Compile... >>

read regex [
    FinalE
 .o. ij    
 .o. dtj
 .o. ttj
 .o. ssj
 .o. LN
 .o. jNN
.o. rd ! the long rule in the beginning
.o. SK2SSK
.o. SKK2SK
.o. sl
.o. zz
.o. z    !not for LOAN conversion
.o. cc   !not for LOAN conversion
.o. c    !not for LOAN conversion
.o. eCns !not for LOAN conversion
.o. it
.o. H2M
.o. M2H
.o. hit2dit
.o. longain2ndsyll
.o. tjfromšafter2syll
.o. SamiLetters
.o. 1stysllæ
.o. 1styslle
.o. 1stsylldiphthong
.o. labialharmony
.o. oa2åG1
.o. phones
!.o. technical
] ;

invert net ;

!save ~/words/dicts/smesmj/bin/j.fst
